Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-620] Formulary; accessibility
requirements. (a) Each mutual benefit society offering or renewing an
individual and group hospital or medical service plan contract on or after
January 1, 2017, shall provide the following information via a public website
and through a toll-free number that is posted on the mutual benefit society's
website:

(1) Its formulary; provided that notice of any
changes due to the addition of a new drug or deletion of any existing drug
shall be made available no later than seventy-two hours after the effective
date of the change; provided further that notice of other changes, including
drug strength or form, shall be made available within fourteen calendar days of
the effective date of the change;

(2) Provide a system that allows a subscriber or
potential subscriber to determine whether prescription drugs are covered under
the plan's medical benefits and typically administered by a provider, along
with any cost-sharing imposed on such drugs;

(3) Indicate a dollar amount range of cost-sharing
typically paid by a subscriber of each specific drug included on the formulary
based on the information the mutual benefit society has available, as follows:

(A) $100 and under: $;

(B) Over $100 to $250: $$;

(C) Over $250 to $500: $$$;

(D) Over $500 to $1,000: $$$$; and

(E) Over $1,000: $$$$$; and

(4) Display standardized content for the formulary
for each product offered by the plan pursuant to recommendations made by the
formulary accessibility working group established pursuant to Act 197, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2015.

(b) For the purposes of this section,
"formulary" means the complete list of drugs preferred for use and
eligible for coverage under a policy, including drugs covered under the policy's
pharmacy benefit and medical benefit as defined by the health care service
plans.

(c) This section shall not apply to limited
benefit health insurance as provided in section 431:10A-102.5; provided further
that this section shall not apply to medicare, medicaid, or other federally
financed plans. [L 2015, c 197, §2]

Note

Formulary accessibility working group; recommendations for
standard formulary template to 2016 legislature (dissolved June 30, 2016). L 2015,
c 197, §4.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next